Maine, session 132, LD1645.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §408-A, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Request from Legislators; expedited process. Notwithstanding subsection 3, if
a request for a public record is submitted pursuant to this section by at least 3 Legislators,
the agency or official having custody or control of the public record shall comply with the
request within 20 working days after the request is received, as determined pursuant to
subsection 3. For purposes of this subsection, at least 3 of the Legislators submitting the
request must be members of the Legislature's government oversight committee and at least
one of those 3 members is the Senate or House of Representatives chair.